Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1927.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin GREATER MINNEAPOLIS COUNCIL OF CHURCHES SERVICES AND SUPPORTS FACILITY.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for a grant to Greater Minneapolis Council of Churches, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to evaluate potential sites and acquire property for a site for a new services and supports facility. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end